fr: Caractéristiques de l’arc/arbalète: Tirage réglable; Mécanisme anti-feu sec; Lunette éclairée; Système de fixation de branches (ILF); Carquois détachable rapidement; Engagement automatique de sécurité; Autre
vi: Tính năng cung/nỏ: Điều chỉnh được dây cung; Cơ chế ngăn bắn khi không có tên; Ống ngắm có đèn; Lắp cánh cung ILF; Túi đựng tháo nhanh; Tự động lên dây an toàn; Khác
el: Χαρακτηριστικά τόξου/βαλλίστρας: Ρυθμιζόμενη έλξη; Μηχανισμός Anti-dry fire; Φωτιζόμενος τηλεφακός; Διεθνές σύστημα εφαρμογής ελασμάτων (ILF); Φαρέτρα γρήγορης αποσύνδεσης; Αυτόματη εμπλοκή ασφαλείας; Άλλο
bg-BG: Характеристики на лък/арбалет: Регулируемо теглене; Механизъм против сух огън; Осветен обхват; Международна система за приспособяване на крайниците (ILF); Бързо отделяне на колчана; Автоматично включване на безопасността; Други
pt-PT: Características do arco/besta: Tração ajustável; Mecanismo antifogo seco; Âmbito iluminado; Sistema internacional de adaptação de membros (ILF); Aljava de desprendimento rápido; Acionamento automático de segurança; Outro
sv: Detaljer för pilbåge/armborst: Justerbar dragning; Antitork brandmekanism; Upplyst kikarsikte; International limb fitting system (ILF); Snabbavtagbart koger; Säkerhetsinkoppling; Övrigt
th: คุณลักษณะคันธนู/หน้าไม้: ปรับระยะดึงได้; กลไกการป้องกันการยิงโดยไม่ใส่กระตุ้น; กล้องเล็งมีแสงส่องสว่าง; ระบบความเข้ากับได้ของปีกธนูสากล (ILF); กระบอกใส่ลูกศรถอดง่าย; ระบบป้องกันความปลอดภัยอัตโนมัติ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Vlastnosti luku / kuše: Nastaviteľný ťah; Mechanizmus proti suchému ohňu; Rozsah osvetlenia; Medzinárodný systém prispôsobenia končatín (ILF); Rýchlo odnímateľný tulec; Bezpečnostné automatické zapínanie; Iné
tr: Yay ve Arbalet özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir çekiş; Kuru yangın önleyici mekanizma; Işıklı dürbün; Uluslararası uzuv takma sistemi (ILF); Hızlı bırakma sadak; Güvenlik otomatik devreye girme; Diğer
zh-CN: 弓/弩特点: 可调拉力; 防闪燃机制; 发光范围; 国际肢体配件 (ILF); 速拆卸箭袋; 安全自动啮合; 其他
nb: Bue- og armbrøstfunksjoner: Regulerbar skuff; Antitørr brannmekanisme; Opplyst sikte; Internasjonalt lemtilpasningssystem (ILF); Kogger med hurtig avkobling; Sikkerhet med automatisk innkobling; Annet
de: Bogen-/Armbrustfunktionen: Verstellbares Zugband; Anti-Dry-Fire-Mechanismus; Beleuchtetes Zielfernrohr; International Limb Fitting-System (ILF); Schnell abnehmbarer Köcher; Automatische Sicherheitseinrastung; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Caracteristici arc/arbaletă: Lungime de tragere reglabilă; Mecanism de prevenire a eliberării corzii în gol; Vizor iluminat; International limb fitting system (ILF); Tolbă cu desprindere rapidă; Activare automată a mecanismului de siguranță; Altele
hr-HR: Značajke luka/samostrela: Podesivo zatezanje; Mehanizam protiv opaljivanja na suho; Osvijetljeni ciljnik; Međunarodni sustav prilagodbe vrhova luka (ILF); Tobolac za brzo odvajanje; Sigurnosno automatsko uključivanje; Ostalo
ko: 활/석궁 기능: 조절식 조임; 건식 화재 방지 메커니즘; 조명 범위; 국제 사지 피팅 시스템(ILF); 빠른 분리 떨림; 안전 자동 참여; 기타
zh-TW: 弓弩特點: 拉力可調; 防空槍機制; 照明範圍; 國際肢體適配系統 (ILF); 快速拆卸箭袋; 安全自動接合; 其他
sl-SI: Lastnosti loka/samostrela: Nastavljiv izvleček; Mehanizem proti suhemu požaru; Osvetljen daljnogled; Mednarodni sistem za prilagajanje udov (ILF); Hitro odstranljiv tok; Varnostni samodejni vklop; Drugo
cs: Vlastnosti ohřívače lahví: Nastavitelný tah; Ochrana proti výstřelu naprázdno; Osvětlený dalekohled; ILF (International limb fitting system); Rychle odnímatelný toulec; Bezpečnostní automatické zapínání; Jiné
da: Funktioner for bue/armbrøst: Justerbart træk; Anti-tør-brandmekanisme; Oplyst kikkert; Internationalt lemmetilpasningssystem (ILF); Hurtigløsnende; Sikker automatisk indkobling; Andet
fi: Jousen/varsijousen ominaisuudet: Säädettävä veto; Kuivumista estävä palomekanismi; Valaistu kiikari; Kansainvälinen raajan sovitusjärjestelmä (ILF); Nopeasti irrotettava nuolikotelo; Turvallisuuden automaattikytkentä; Muu
hu: Íj/Számszeríj jellemzői: Állítható húzás; Nyíl nélküli lövést gátló mechanizmus; Megvilágított távcső; Nemzetközi íjillesztési rendszer (ILF); Gyorsan levehető tegez; Biztonsági automatikus bekapcsolás; Egyéb
ru: Характеристики лука или арбалета: Регулируемое натяжение; Механизм защиты от пустого пуска; Прицел с подсветкой; Международная система крепления на плече (ILF); Быстросъемный колчан; Автоматическое включение безопасности; Другое
ja: ボウ/クロスボウフィーチャー: 調整可能なドロワー; 空焚き防止機構; 照明付き望遠鏡; インターナショナルリムフィッティングシステム (ILF); クイックデタッチクィーバー; 安全なオートエンゲージ; その他
it: Funzionalità dell'arco/balestra: Tirante regolabile; Meccanismo antisecco per la prevenzione degli incendi; Campo di visibilità illuminato; Sistema internazionale di montaggio degli arti (ILF); Faretra a sgancio rapido; Inserimento automatico di sicurezza; Altro
nl: Kenmerken boog/kruisboog: Verstelbare trekkracht; Mechanisme tegen droogvuur; Verlicht vizier; ILF-systeem (International Limb Fitting); Snel afneembare pijlkoker; Automatische veiligheidsinschakeling; Andere
pt-BR: Características do arco/besta: Saque ajustável; Mecanismo antidisparo sem munição; Mira iluminada; Sistema internacional de adaptação de membros (ILF); Aljava de desconexão rápida; Engate automático de segurança; Outro
pl: Charakterystyka łuku/kuszy: Regulowane rysowanie; Mechanizm przeciwpożarowy zapobiegający wysuszeniu; Podświetlany zakres; Międzynarodowy system mocowania kończyn (ILF); Szybkie odłączanie kołczanu; Automatyczny włącznik bezpieczeństwa; Inne
lt-LT: Lanko / arbaleto ypatybės: Reguliuojamas įtempimas; Apsaugos nuo iššovimo be strėlės mechanizmas; Apšviečiamas taikiklis; Tarptautinis šakų tvirtinimas (ILF); Greitai nuimama strėlinė; Saugus automatinis įjungimas; Kita
es: Características del arco/ballesta: Tensión ajustable; Mecanismo de antidisparo en seco; Mira iluminada; Sistema internacional de ajuste de extremidades (ILF); Carcaj de desmontaje rápido; Activación automática de seguridad; Otros
en: Bow/Crossbow features: Adjustable draw; Anti-dry fire mechanism; Illuminated scope; International limb fitting system (ILF); Quick detach quiver; Safety auto-engage; Other